District of Columbia statutes.
31-3520

Oversight role and fiduciary obligation of directors, officers, and employees.

(a)

The Mayor shall promulgate regulations establishing the oversight role and fiduciary obligation of each member of the board of directors or trustees of a corporation issued a certificate of authority under this chapter. Such regulations shall require the corporation to adopt a code of conduct and compliance program for all board members, officers and employees of the corporation.

(b)

A corporation issued a certificate of authority under this chapter shall file with the Mayor annually, on or before June 1, a copy of its bylaws which shall require the corporation’s board of directors or trustees to adopt policies consistent with the provisions of the code of conduct and compliance program regulations promulgated by the Mayor. Any amendments to the bylaws shall be filed with the Mayor by the corporation within 30 days of adoption by the board.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-245, § 21, 44 DCR 1158
1981 Ed., § 35-4720.